Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1808
Mandated project costs, defined.

Mandated project costs means capital costs incurred or to be incurred by a public entity with respect to a mandated project, including the payment of debt service on mandated project bonds, either directly or through a power participation or purchase agreement, and any related operating expenses.

Laws 2006, LB 548, § 8.